California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(A) Subjects the original property to reappraisal at its current fair market value in accordance with Section 110.1 or 5803.

(B) Results in a base year value determined in accordance with this section, Section 69, Section 69.3, Section 69.5, or Section 69.6 because the property qualifies under this section, Section 69, Section 69.3, Section 69.5, or Section 69.6 as a replacement dwelling or property.

(d) Property tax relief under this section is not available for a replacement property if the owner or owners of the original property do either of the
 following:

(1) Receive property tax relief under Section 74.7.

(2) Sign a claim under Section 63.1 or 63.2 allowing the base year value to stay with the original property.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) The “original property” means the qualified contaminated property.

(2) “Equal or lesser value” means the amount of the full cash value of a replacement property that does not exceed one of the following:

(A) One hundred five percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property, if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the first year following the date of the sale of the
 original property.

(B) One hundred ten percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property, if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the second year following the date of the sale of the original property.

(C) One hundred fifteen percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property, if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the third year following the date of the sale of the original property.

(D) One hundred twenty percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property, if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the fourth year following the date of the sale of the original property.

(E) One hundred twenty-five percent of
 the amount of the full cash value of the original property, if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the fifth year following the date of the sale of the original property.

For purposes of this paragraph, if the replacement property is, in part, purchased and, in part, newly constructed, the date the replacement property is “acquired or newly constructed” is the date of acquisition or the date of completion of construction, whichever is later.

(3) The base year value of the original property shall be the base year value of the original property as determined in accordance with Section 110.1, with the inflation factor adjustments permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 110.1. The base year value of the original property shall also include any inflation factor adjustments permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 110.1 up to the date the replacement property is acquired or newly
 constructed, regardless of whether the claimant continued to own the original property during this entire period. The base year or years used to compute the base year value of the original property shall be deemed to be the base year or years of any property to which that base year value is transferred pursuant to this section.

(4) “Fair market value of the replacement property” means the full cash value of the replacement property determined in accordance with Section 110.1 as of the date on which that property was acquired or new construction was completed. If the replacement property is, in part, acquired and, in part, newly constructed, “fair market value of the replacement property” means the fair market value of the land and the improvements as of the date of completion.

(5) “Fair market value of the qualified contaminated property” means the full cash value of the qualified
 contaminated property, as if that property was not contaminated, determined in accordance with Section 110.1, as of the date of its sale or transfer by the claimant.

(6) “Claimant” means any owner of qualified contaminated property claiming the property tax relief provided by this section.

(7) “Comparable replacement property” means a property that is similar in utility and function to the property that it replaces. Property is similar in function and utility if it is, or is intended to be, used in the same manner as the qualified contaminated property.

(f) (1) A claimant is not eligible for the property tax relief provided by this section unless a claim is filed within three years of the date the replacement property was purchased or the new construction of the replacement property was
 completed.

(2) The claimant shall provide to the assessor the following information:

(A) Proof that the claimant did not participate or acquiesce in any act or omission that rendered the real property uninhabitable or unusable, as applicable, or is related to any individual or entity that committed that act or omission.

(B) Proof that the qualified contaminated property has been designated as a toxic or environmental hazard or as an environmental cleanup site by an agency of the State of California or the federal government.

(3) The State Board of Equalization shall design the form for claiming eligibility.

(g) (1) Upon the timely filing of a claim, the assessor shall
 adjust the new base year value as of the date the replacement property is acquired or the date the new construction of the replacement property is completed, whichever is later.

(2) Any taxes that were levied on the replacement property prior to the filing of the claim on the basis of the replacement property’s new base year value, and any allowable annual adjustments thereto, shall be canceled or refunded to the claimant to the extent that the taxes exceed the amount that would be due when determined on the basis of the adjusted new base year value.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 75.10, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 shall be utilized for purposes of implementing this subdivision, including adjustments of the new base year value of replacement properties acquired prior to the sale or transfer of the qualified contaminated property.

(h) This section applies only to replacement property that is acquired or newly constructed on or after January 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 312, Sec. 3.   (SB 890)   Effective October 4, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

69.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, any person over the age of 55 years, or any severely and permanently disabled person, who resides in property that is eligible for the homeowners’ exemption under subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and Section 218 may transfer, subject to the conditions and limitations provided in this section, the base year value of that property to any replacement dwelling of equal or lesser value that is located within the same county and is purchased or newly constructed by that person as his or her principal residence within two years of the sale by that person of the
 original property, provided that the base year value of the original property shall not be transferred to the replacement dwelling until the original property is sold.

(2) Notwithstanding the limitation in paragraph (1) requiring that the original property and the replacement dwelling be located in the same county, this limitation shall not apply in any county in which the county board of supervisors, after consultation with local affected agencies within the boundaries of the county, adopts an ordinance making the provisions of paragraph (1) also applicable to situations in which replacement dwellings are located in that county and the original properties are located in another county within this state. The authorization contained in this paragraph shall be applicable in a county only if the ordinance adopted by the board of supervisors complies with all of the following requirements:

(A) It is adopted only after consultation between the board of supervisors and all other local affected agencies within the county’s boundaries.

(B) It requires that all claims for transfers of base year value from original property located in another county be granted if the claims meet the applicable requirements of both subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and this section.

(C) It requires that all base year valuations of original property located in another county and determined by its assessor be accepted in connection with the granting of claims for transfers of base year value.

(D) It provides that its provisions are operative for a period of not less than five years.

(E) The ordinance specifies the date on and after which its provisions shall be applicable. However, the date specified shall not be earlier than November 9, 1988. The specified applicable date may be a date earlier than the date the county adopts the ordinance.

(b) In addition to meeting the requirements of subdivision (a), any person claiming the property tax relief provided by this section shall be eligible for that relief only if the following conditions are met:

(1) The claimant is an owner and a resident of the original property either at the time of its sale, or at the time when the original property was substantially damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity, or within two years of the purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling.

(2) The original property is eligible for the
 homeowners’ exemption, as the result of the claimant’s ownership and occupation of the property as his or her principal residence, either at the time of its sale, or at the time when the original property was substantially damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity, or within two years of the purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling.

(3) At the time of the sale of the original property, the claimant or the claimant’s spouse who resides with the claimant is at least 55 years of age, or is severely and permanently disabled.

(4) At the time of claiming the property tax relief provided by subdivision (a), the claimant is an owner of a replacement dwelling and occupies it as his or her principal place of residence and, as a result thereof, the property is currently eligible for the homeowners’ exemption or would be eligible for the exemption except that the property
 is already receiving the exemption because of an exemption claim filed by the previous owner.

(5) The original property of the claimant is sold by him or her within two years of the purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling. For purposes of this paragraph, the purchase or new construction of the replacement dwelling includes the purchase of that portion of land on which the replacement building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode of the claimant will be situated and that, pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (g), constitutes a part of the replacement dwelling.

(6) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the replacement dwelling, including that portion of land on which it is situated that is specified in paragraph (5), is located entirely within the same county as the claimant’s original property.

(7) The claimant has not previously been granted, as a claimant, the property tax relief provided by this section, except that this paragraph shall not apply to any person who becomes severely and permanently disabled subsequent to being granted, as a claimant, the property tax relief provided by this section for any person over the age of 55 years. In order to prevent duplication of claims under this section within this state, county assessors shall report quarterly to the State Board of Equalization that information from claims filed in accordance with subdivision (f) and from county records as is specified by the board necessary to identify fully all claims under this section allowed by assessors and all claimants who have thereby received relief. The board may specify that the information include all or a part of the names and social security numbers of claimants and their spouses and the identity and location of the replacement dwelling to
 which the claim applies. The information may be required in the form of data processing media or other media and in a format that is compatible with the recordkeeping processes of the counties and the auditing procedures of the state.

(c) The property tax relief provided by this section shall be available if the original property or the replacement dwelling, or both, of the claimant includes, but is not limited to, either of the following:

(1) A unit or lot within a cooperative housing corporation, a community apartment project, a condominium project, or a planned unit development. If the unit or lot constitutes the original property of the claimant, the assessor shall transfer to the claimant’s replacement dwelling only the base year value of the claimant’s unit or lot and his or her share in any common area reserved as an appurtenance of that unit or lot. If the unit or lot
 constitutes the replacement dwelling of the claimant, the assessor shall transfer the base year value of the claimant’s original property only to the unit or lot of the claimant and any share of the claimant in any common area reserved as an appurtenance of that unit or lot.

(2) A manufactured home or a manufactured home and any land owned by the claimant on which the manufactured home is situated. For purposes of this paragraph, “land owned by the claimant” includes a pro rata interest in a resident-owned mobilehome park that is assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 62.1.

(A) If the manufactured home or the manufactured home and the land on which it is situated constitutes the claimant’s original property, the assessor shall transfer to the claimant’s replacement dwelling either the base year value of the manufactured home or the base year value of the manufactured home
 and the land on which it is situated, as appropriate. If the manufactured home dwelling that constitutes the original property of the claimant includes an interest in a resident-owned mobilehome park, the assessor shall transfer to the claimant’s replacement dwelling the base year value of the claimant’s manufactured home and his or her pro rata portion of the real property of the park. No transfer of base year value shall be made by the assessor of that portion of land that does not constitute a part of the original property, as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (g).

(B) If the manufactured home or the manufactured home and the land on which it is situated constitutes the claimant’s replacement dwelling, the assessor shall transfer the base year value of the claimant’s original property either to the manufactured home or the manufactured home and the land on which it is situated, as appropriate. If the manufactured home dwelling that
 constitutes the replacement dwelling of the claimant includes an interest in a resident-owned mobilehome park, the assessor shall transfer the base year value of the claimant’s original property to the manufactured home of the claimant and his or her pro rata portion of the park. No transfer of base year value shall be made by the assessor to that portion of land that does not constitute a part of the replacement dwelling, as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

This subdivision shall be subject to the limitations specified in subdivision (d).

(d) The property tax relief provided by this section shall be available to a claimant who is the coowner of the original property, as a joint tenant, a tenant in common, a community property owner, or a present beneficiary of a trust subject to the following limitations:

(1) If a single
 replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed by all of the coowners and each coowner retains an interest in the replacement dwelling, the claimant shall be eligible under this section whether or not any or all of the remaining coowners would otherwise be eligible claimants.

(2) If two or more replacement dwellings are separately purchased or newly constructed by two or more coowners and more than one coowner would otherwise be an eligible claimant, only one coowner shall be eligible under this section. These coowners shall determine by mutual agreement which one of them shall be deemed eligible.

(3) If two or more replacement dwellings are separately purchased or newly constructed by two coowners who held the original property as community property, only the coowner who has attained the age of 55 years, or is severely and permanently disabled, shall be eligible under
 this section. If both spouses are over 55 years of age, they shall determine by mutual agreement which one of them is eligible.

In the case of coowners whose original property is a multiunit dwelling, the limitations imposed by paragraphs (2) and (3) shall only apply to coowners who occupied the same dwelling unit within the original property at the time specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(e) Upon the sale of original property, the assessor shall determine a new base year value for that property in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and Section 110.1, whether or not a replacement dwelling is subsequently purchased or newly constructed by the former owner or owners of the original property.

This section shall not apply unless the transfer of the original property is a
 change in ownership that either (1) subjects that property to reappraisal at its current fair market value in accordance with Section 110.1 or 5803 or (2) results in a base year value determined in accordance with this section, Section 69, or Section 69.3 because the property qualifies under this section, Section 69, or Section 69.3 as a replacement dwelling or property.

(f) (1) A claimant shall not be eligible for the property tax relief provided by this section unless the claimant provides to the assessor, on a form that shall be designed by the State Board of Equalization and that the assessor shall make available upon request, the following information:

(A) The name and social security number of each claimant and of any spouse of the claimant who is a record owner of the replacement dwelling.

(B) Proof that the claimant or the claimant’s spouse who resided on the original property with the claimant was, at the time of its sale, at least 55 years of age, or severely and permanently disabled. Proof of severe and permanent disability shall be considered a certification, signed by a licensed physician and surgeon of appropriate specialty, attesting to the claimant’s severely and permanently disabled condition. In the absence of available proof that a person is over 55 years of age, the claimant shall certify under penalty of perjury that the age requirement is met. In the case of a severely and permanently disabled claimant either of the following shall be submitted:

(i) A certification, signed by a licensed physician or surgeon of appropriate specialty that identifies specific reasons why the disability necessitates a move to the replacement dwelling and the disability-related requirements, including any locational
 requirements, of a replacement dwelling. The claimant shall substantiate that the replacement dwelling meets disability-related requirements so identified and that the primary reason for the move to the replacement dwelling is to satisfy those requirements. If the claimant, or the claimant’s spouse or guardian, so declares under penalty of perjury, it shall be rebuttably presumed that the primary purpose of the move to the replacement dwelling is to satisfy identified disability-related requirements.

(ii) The claimant’s substantiation that the primary purpose of the move to the replacement dwelling is to alleviate financial burdens caused by the disability. If the claimant, or the claimant’s spouse or guardian, so declares under penalty of perjury, it shall be rebuttably presumed that the primary purpose of the move is to alleviate the financial burdens caused by the disability.

(C) The address and, if known, the assessor’s parcel number of the original property.

(D) The date of the claimant’s sale of the original property and the date of the claimant’s purchase or new construction of a replacement dwelling.

(E) A statement by the claimant that he or she occupied the replacement dwelling as his or her principal place of residence on the date of the filing of his or her claim.

(F) Any claim under this section shall be filed within three years of the date the replacement dwelling was purchased or the new construction of the replacement dwelling was completed subject to subdivision (k) or (m).

(2) A claim for transfer of base year value under this section that is filed after the expiration of the filing period set
 forth in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) shall be considered by the assessor, subject to all of the following conditions:

(A) Any base year value transfer granted pursuant to that claim shall apply commencing with the lien date of the assessment year in which the claim is filed.

(B) The full cash value of the replacement property in the assessment year described in subparagraph (A) shall be the base year value of the real property in the assessment year in which the base year value was transferred, factored to the assessment year described in subparagraph (A) for both of the following:

(i) Inflation as annually determined in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(ii) Any subsequent new construction occurring with respect to
 the subject real property that does not qualify for property tax relief pursuant to the criteria set forth in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (h).

(g) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Person over the age of 55 years” means any person or the spouse of any person who has attained the age of 55 years or older at the time of the sale of the original property.

(2) “Base year value of the original property” means its base year value, as determined in accordance with Section 110.1, with the adjustments permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, determined as of the date immediately prior to the date that the original property is sold by the claimant, or in the case where the original
 property has been substantially damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity and the owner does not rebuild on the original property, determined as of the date immediately prior to the misfortune or calamity.

If the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed after the transfer of the original property, “base year value of the original property” also includes any inflation factor adjustments permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 110.1 for the period subsequent to the sale of the original property. The base year or years used to compute the “base year value of the original property” shall be deemed to be the base year or years of any property to which that base year value is transferred pursuant to this section.

(3) “Replacement dwelling” means a building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, that is owned and occupied by a
 claimant as his or her principal place of residence, and any land owned by the claimant on which the building, structure, or other shelter is situated. For purposes of this paragraph, land constituting a part of a replacement dwelling includes only that area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence, and “land owned by the claimant” includes land for which the claimant either holds a leasehold interest described in subdivision (c) of Section 61 or a land purchase contract. Each unit of a multiunit dwelling shall be considered a separate replacement dwelling. For purposes of this paragraph, “area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence” includes all land if any nonresidential uses of the property are only incidental to the use of the property as a residential site. For purposes of this paragraph, “land owned by the claimant” includes an ownership interest in a resident-owned mobilehome park that is assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 62.1.

(4) “Original property” means a building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, that is owned and occupied by a claimant as his or her principal place of residence, and any land owned by the claimant on which the building, structure, or other shelter is situated. For purposes of this paragraph, land constituting a part of the original property includes only that area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence, and “land owned by the claimant” includes land for which the claimant either holds a leasehold interest described in subdivision (c) of Section 61 or a land purchase contract. Each unit of a multiunit dwelling shall be considered a separate original property. For purposes of this paragraph, “area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence” includes all land if any nonresidential uses of the property are only incidental to the use of the property as
 a residential site. For purposes of this paragraph, “land owned by the claimant” includes an ownership interest in a resident-owned mobilehome park that is assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 62.1.

(5) “Equal or lesser value” means that the amount of the full cash value of a replacement dwelling does not exceed one of the following:

(A) One hundred percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed prior to the date of the sale of the original property.

(B) One hundred and five percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed within the first year following the date of the sale of the original property.

(C) One hundred and ten percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed within the second year following the date of the sale of the original property.

For the purposes of this paragraph, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (h), if the replacement dwelling is, in part, purchased and, in part, newly constructed, the date the “replacement dwelling is purchased or newly constructed” is the date of purchase or the date of completion of construction, whichever is later.

(6) “Full cash value of the replacement dwelling” means its full cash value, determined in accordance with Section 110.1, as of the date on which it was purchased or new construction was completed, and after the purchase or the completion of new construction.

(7) “Full cash value of the original property” means, either:

(A) Its new base year value, determined in accordance with subdivision (e), without the application of subdivision (h) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, plus the adjustments permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA and subdivision (f) of Section 110.1 for the period from the date of its sale by the claimant to the date on which the replacement property was purchased or new construction was completed.

(B) In the case where the original property has been substantially damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity and the owner does not rebuild on the original property, its full cash value, as determined in accordance with Section 110, immediately prior to its
 substantial damage or destruction by misfortune or calamity, as determined by the county assessor of the county in which the property is located, without the application of subdivision (h) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, plus the adjustments permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, for the period from the date of its sale by the claimant to the date on which the replacement property was purchased or new construction was completed.

(8) “Sale” means any change in ownership of the original property for consideration.

(9) “Claimant” means any person claiming the property tax relief provided by this section. If a spouse of that person is a record owner of the replacement dwelling, the spouse is also a claimant for
 purposes of determining whether in any future claim filed by the spouse under this section the condition of eligibility specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) has been met.

(10) “Property that is eligible for the homeowners’ exemption” includes property that is the principal place of residence of its owner and is entitled to exemption pursuant to Section 205.5.

(11) “Person” means any individual, but does not include any firm, partnership, association, corporation, company, or other legal entity or organization of any kind. “Person” includes an individual who is the present beneficiary of a trust.

(12) “Severely and permanently disabled” means any person described in subdivision (b) of Section 74.3.

(13) For the purposes of this section, property
 is “substantially damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity” if either the land or the improvements sustain physical damage amounting to more than 50 percent of either the land’s or the improvement’s full cash value immediately prior to the misfortune or calamity. Damage includes a diminution in the value of property as a result of restricted access to the property where the restricted access was caused by the misfortune or calamity and is permanent in nature.

(h) (1) Upon the timely filing of a claim described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), the assessor shall adjust the new base year value of the replacement dwelling in conformity with this section. This adjustment shall be made as of the latest of the following dates:

(A) The date the original property is sold.

(B) The date the replacement dwelling is purchased.

(C) The date the new construction of the replacement dwelling is completed.

(2) Any taxes that were levied on the replacement dwelling prior to the filing of the claim on the basis of the replacement dwelling’s new base year value, and any allowable annual adjustments thereto, shall be canceled or refunded to the claimant to the extent that the taxes exceed the amount that would be due when determined on the basis of the adjusted new base year value.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 75.10, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) shall be utilized for purposes of implementing this subdivision, including adjustments of the new base year value of replacement dwellings acquired prior to the sale of the original property.

(4) In the case where a claim under this section has been timely filed and granted, and new construction is performed upon the replacement dwelling subsequent to the transfer of base year value, the property tax relief provided by this section also shall apply to the replacement dwelling, as improved, and thus there shall be no reassessment upon completion of the new construction if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The new construction is completed within two years of the date of the sale of the original property and the owner notifies the assessor in writing of completion of the new construction within six months after completion.

(B) The fair market value of the new construction on the date of completion, plus the full cash value of the replacement dwelling on the date of acquisition, is not more than the full cash value of the original property as determined pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (g) for purposes of granting the original claim.

(i) Any claimant may rescind a claim for the property tax relief provided by this section and shall not be considered to have received that relief for purposes of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b), and the assessor shall grant the rescission, if a written notice of rescission is delivered to the office of the assessor as follows:

(1) A written notice of rescission signed by the original filing claimant or claimants is delivered to the office of the assessor in which the original claim was filed.

(2) (A) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the notice of rescission is delivered to the office of the assessor before the date that the county first issues, as a result of relief granted under this section, a refund check for property taxes imposed upon the replacement dwelling. If granting relief will not result in a refund of property taxes, then the notice shall be delivered before payment is first made of any property taxes, or any portion thereof, imposed upon the replacement dwelling consistent with relief granted under this section. If payment of the taxes is not made, then notice shall be delivered before the first date that those property taxes, or any portion thereof, imposed upon the replacement dwelling, consistent with relief granted under this section, are delinquent.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, any time
 the notice of rescission is delivered to the office of the assessor within six years after relief was granted, provided that the replacement property has been vacated as the claimant’s principal place of residence within 90 days after the original claim was filed, regardless of whether the property continues to receive the homeowners’ exemption. If the rescission increases the base year value of a property, or the homeowners’ exemption has been incorrectly allowed, appropriate escape assessments or supplemental assessments, including interest as provided in Section 506, shall be imposed. The limitations periods for any escape assessments or supplemental assessments shall not commence until July 1 of the assessment year in which the notice of rescission is delivered to the office of the assessor.

(3) The notice is accompanied by the payment of a fee as the assessor may require, provided that the fee shall not exceed an amount reasonably related
 to the estimated cost of processing a rescission claim, including both direct costs and developmental and indirect costs, such as costs for overhead, personnel, supplies, materials, office space, and computers.

(j) (1) With respect to the transfer of base year value of original properties to replacement dwellings located in the same county, this section, except as provided in paragraph (3) or (4), shall apply to any replacement dwelling that is purchased or newly constructed on or after November 6, 1986.

(2) With respect to the transfer of base year value of original properties to replacement dwellings located in different counties, except as provided in paragraph (4), this section shall apply to any replacement dwelling that is purchased or newly constructed on or after the date specified in accordance with subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (a) in the ordinance of the county in which the replacement dwelling is located, but shall not apply to any replacement dwelling which was purchased or newly constructed before November 9, 1988.

(3) With respect to the transfer of base year value by a severely and permanently disabled person, this section shall apply only to replacement dwellings that are purchased or newly constructed on or after June 6, 1990.

(4) The amendments made to subdivision (e) by the act adding this paragraph shall apply only to replacement dwellings under Section 69 that are acquired or newly constructed on or after October 20, 1991, and shall apply commencing with the 1991–92 fiscal year.

(k) (1) In the case in which a county adopts an ordinance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) that establishes an
 applicable date which is more than three years prior to the date of adoption of the ordinance, those potential claimants who purchased or constructed replacement dwellings more than three years prior to the date of adoption of the ordinance and who would, therefore, be precluded from filing a timely claim, shall be deemed to have timely filed a claim if the claim is filed within three years after the date that the ordinance is adopted. This paragraph may not be construed as a waiver of any other requirement of this section.

(2) In the case in which a county assessor corrects a base year value to reflect a pro rata change in ownership of a resident-owned mobilehome park that occurred between January 1, 1989, and January 1, 2002, pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 62.1, those claimants who purchased or constructed replacement dwellings more than three years prior to the correction and who would, therefore, be precluded from
 filing a timely claim, shall be deemed to have timely filed a claim if the claim is filed within three years of the date of notice of the correction of the base year value to reflect the pro rata change in ownership. This paragraph may not be construed as a waiver of any other requirement of this section.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a claimant who has transferred his or her replacement dwelling prior to filing a claim.

(4) The property tax relief provided by this section, but filed under this subdivision, shall apply prospectively only, commencing with the lien date of the assessment year in which the claim is filed. There shall be no refund or cancellation of taxes prior to the date that the claim is filed.

(l) No escape assessment may be levied if a transfer of base year value under this section has been
 erroneously granted by the assessor pursuant to an expired ordinance authorizing intercounty transfers of base year value.

(m) (1) The amendments made to subdivisions (b) and (g) of this section by Chapter 613 of the Statutes of 2001 shall apply:

(A) With respect to the transfer of base year value of original properties to replacement dwellings located in the same county, to any replacement dwelling that is purchased or newly constructed on or after November 6, 1986.

(B) With respect to the transfer of base year value of original properties to replacement dwellings located in different counties, to any replacement dwelling that is purchased or newly constructed on or after the date specified in accordance with subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) in the ordinance of the county in
 which the replacement dwelling is located, but not to any replacement dwelling that was purchased or newly constructed before November 9, 1988.

(C) With respect to the transfer of base year value by a severely and permanently disabled person, to replacement dwellings that are purchased or newly constructed on or after June 6, 1990.

(2) The property tax relief provided by this section in accordance with this subdivision shall apply prospectively only commencing with the lien date of the assessment year in which the claim is filed. There shall be no refund or cancellation of taxes prior to the date that the claim is filed.

(n) A claim filed under this section is not a public document and is not subject to public inspection, except that a claim shall be available for inspection by the claimant or the claimant’s spouse,
 the claimant’s or the claimant’s spouse’s legal representative, the trustee of a trust in which the claimant or the claimant’s spouse is a present beneficiary, and the executor or administrator of the claimant’s or the claimant’s spouse’s estate.

(o) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply commencing with the lien date for the 2012–13 fiscal year.
